en: Bourbon vanilla
bg: Бурбонска ванилия
de: Bourbon Vanille, Bourbon-Vanille, Bourbonvanille
es: Vainilla Bourbon
fi: bourbon-vanilja
fr: vanille bourbon, bourbon vanille
hr: bourbon vanilije, burbon vanilije
it: vaniglia Bourbon
nl: bourbonvanille, Bourbon vanille
pl: wanilia bourbon, bourbon wanilia

en: bourbon vanilla flavor paste
hr: pasta okusa bourbon vanilije
it: pasta aromatizzata alla vaniglia Bourbon

en: vanilla powder
de: Vanille-Pulver, Vanillepulver
es: vainilla en polvo
fi: vaniljajauhe
fr: vanille en poudre, poudre de vanille, vanille moulue
hr: prah vanilije
it: vaniglia in polvere
lt: vanilės milteliai
nl: vanillepoeder
pl: wanilia w proszku
pt: vanille em pó
sv: vaniljpulver

en: Bourbon vanilla powder
bg: Бурбонска ванилия на прах
de: Bourbon Vanille gemahlen, Bourbon-Vanillepulver, Bourbonvanilleschotenpulver
fr: poudre de vanille Bourbon
hr: bourbon vanilija u prahu
it: vaniglia Bourbon in polvere

en: vanilla extract
ar: مستخلص فانيليا عي
bg: ванилов екстракт, екстракт от ванилия
ca: extracte de vainilla
cs: vanilkový extrakt, extrakt z vanilky, vanilkový výtažek
da: vaniljeekstrakt, vaniljeessens
de: Vanilleextrakt, Vanille Extrakt
el: απόσταγμα βανίλιας
es: extracto de vainilla, esencia de vainilla
et: vanilliekstrakt
fi: vaniljauute
fr: extrait de vanille
he: תמצית וניל
hu: vaníliakivonat, vanília kivonat, vanília-kivonat
it: estratto di vaniglia
ja: バニラエキス
jv: vanilla èkstrak
ko: 바닐라 추출액
lt: vaniles ekstraktas
lv: vaniļas ekstrakts
mk: екстракт од ванила
ms: ekstrak vanila
nl: vanille-extract
nn: vaniljeekstrakt
pl: ekstrakt z wanilii, ekstrakt waniliowy
pt: extrato de baunilha, extracto de baunilha
ro: extract de vanilie
ru: экстракт ванили
sk: výtažok z vanilky
sl: izvlecek vanilje
sr: ekstrakt vanile
sv: vaniljextrakt
uk: екстракт ванілі, ванільний екстракт
zh: 香草精精

en: pure vanilla extract
de: reiner Vanilleextrakt, Purer Vanilleextrakt
es: Extracto puro de vainilla
fi: puhdas vaniljauute
fr: extrait pur de vanille
hr: čisti ekstrakt vanilije
it: estratto puro di vaniglia

en: natural vanilla extract
da: naturlig vanilleekstrakt
de: natürlicher Vanilleextrakt, natürliches Vanille-Extrakt
el: φυσικό εκχύλισμα βανίλιας
es: Extracto natural de vainilla
fi: luontainen vaniljauute
fr: extrait naturel de vanille
hr: prirodni ekstrakt vanilije
it: estratto naturale di vaniglia
ja: 天然パニラエキス
nl: natuurlijk vanille-extract
pl: naturalny ekstrakt z wanilii, naturalny ekstrakt waniliowy, naturalny ekstrakt wanilii
pt: extrato natural de baunilha, extracto natural de baunilha
ro: extract natural de vanilie
sr: prirodni ekstrakt vanile
sv: naturlig vaniljextrakt
zh: 天然香草精精

en: bourbon vanilla extract
cs: extrakt z burbonské vanilky, extrakt z bourbonské vanilky
da: bourbon vaniljeekstrakt
de: Bourbon Vanille Extrakt, Vanille-Extrakt Bourbon, Bourbon-Vanille-Extrakt, Bourbon Vanilleextrakt, Bourbonvanilleextrakt, Bourbonvanille Extrakt
es: extracto de vainilla de Bourbon
fi: bourbon-vaniljauute
fr: extrait de vanille bourbon, extrait de vanille de Bourbon
it: estratto di vaniglia Bourbon
nl: Bourbon vanille-extract
pl: ekstrakt z wanilii bourbon, ekstrakt wanilii bourbon
ro: extract de vanilie Bourbon
sv: bourbon vaniljextrakt

en: vanilla pod, vanilla pods, vanilla bean
da: vaniljestang, vaniljestænger
de: Vanilleschoten
es: vainas de vainilla, vaina de vainilla
fi: vaniljatanko, vaniljapapu
fr: gousse de vanille, gousses de vanille, écorce de vanille, vanille en gousse
hr: mahune vanilije, mahuna vanilije
it: baccelli di vaniglia, bacche di vaniglia
nb: vaniljestang, vaniljestenger
nl: vanillestokje, vanillestokjes
nn: vaniljestong, vaniljestenger
pl: laski wanilii, laska wanilii
pt: vagem de baunilha
sv: vaniljstång, vaniljstänger, vaniljböna

en: ground vanilla beans, vanilla bean pieces
bg: Ванилени зрънца
da: formalede vaniljestænger
de: gemahlene Vanilleschoten, Vanilleschoten gemahlen, Vannileschoten gemahlen, vermahlene Vanilleschoten
fi: vaniljatangon palat, vaniljakodat
fr: gousses de vanille moulues, gousses de vanille broyées
hr: mljevene mahune vanilije
it: semi di vaniglia macinat, vaniglia in bacche macinata
pl: kawałki wanilii, laska wanilii w proszku, mielona laska wanilii
sv: mald vaniljstång, vaniljstångbitar

en: exhausted vanilla pod, exhausted vanilla bean
de: extrahierte Vanilleschote
fr: gousse de vanille épuisée, gousses de vanille épuisées
hr: iscrpljena mahuna vanilije
it: baccello di vaniglia esausto
nl: uitgeputte vanillestokjes, geëxtraheerde vanillestokjes, leeg vanillestokje

en: exhausted ground vanilla pod, exhausted ground vanilla bean
de: gemahlene extrahierte Vanilleschoten, extrahierte gemahlene Vanilleschoten
fr: gousses de vanille épuisées broyées, gousses de vanille broyées épuisées
hr: iscrpljena samljevena mahuna vanilije
it: baccelli di vaniglia curati macinati
nl: gemalen geëxtraheerde vanillestokjes

en: exhausted ground Bourbon vanilla pod
de: gemahlene extrahierte Bourbon Vanilleschoten
fr: gousses de vanille Bourbon épuisées broyées
it: baccello di vaniglia Bourbon macinato esausto

en: Bourbon vanilla beans, vanilla bean Bourbon, bourbon vanilla bean, Bourbon vanilla pods
bg: Бурбонски ванилени шушулки
de: Bourbon-Vanilleschote, bourbon vanilleschoten
fi: bourbon-vaniljakodat
fr: gousses de vanille bourbon, fève de vanille bourbon
hr: sjemenke bourbon vanilije, vanilija štapić bourbon
it: baccello di vaniglia Bourbon, bacche di vaniglia Bourbon, bourbon vanilla bean

en: extract and bourbon vanilla seeds
hr: ekstrakt i sjemenke bourbon vanilije
it: estratto e semi di vaniglia bourbon

en: vanilla seeds
da: vaniljekorn
de: Vanillesamen
es: Semillas de vainilla
fi: vaniljansiemen, vaniljan siemenet
fr: graines de vanille, grain de vanille
hr: sjemenke vanilije
it: semi di vaniglia
nl: vanillezaad, vanillezaadjes
sv: vaniljfrö

en: exhausted vanilla seeds
de: Vanillesamen extrahiert
fr: grains de vanille épuisés, grains de vanille épuisée, graines de vanille épuisées
hr: iscrpljene sjemenke vanilije
it: semi di vaniglia estratti

en: vanilla preparation
hr: pripravak vanilija, krema sa okusom vanilije, puding s okusom vanilije
it: preparato alla vaniglia

en: za'atar
xx: za'atar

en: wasabi, wasabi root
xx: wasabi, wasabi japonica
ar: وسابي
bg: уасаби
de: Wasabi
el: γουασάμπι
eo: vasabio
es: wasabi, salsa de wasabi
et: vasaabi
fa: ואסאבי
fi: maustekrassi, wasabi, japaninpiparjuuri
fr: wasabi, raifort japonais
he: वसाबी
hi: वसाबी
hu: vaszabi
it: wasabi, rafano giapponese
ja: ワサビ
ko: 고추냉이
la: Eutrema japonicum, Wasabia japonica
ru: васаби
th: วาซาบิ
tr: vasabi
uk: васабі
yi: וואסאבי
zh: 山葵